South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 3, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-3-975.  A state, county, or municipal jail, or detention facility shall not intercept, record, monitor, or divulge any telephonic communication between an inmate and another person unless ordered by a court on an individual basis. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----